Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1723
Mobile massage therapy establishment license; change of ownership or mobile unit; effect.

Each mobile massage therapy establishment license issued shall be in effect solely for the owner or owners and the mobile unit named thereon and shall expire automatically upon any change of ownership or mobile unit. An original application for licensure shall be submitted and approved before such establishment may reopen for business.

Laws 2019, LB244, § 12.